District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-607

Products illegally brought into District; seizure; notice to owners; destruction.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 27, 1925, 43 Stat. 1005, ch. 358, § 7
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1937, Pub. L. 91-650, title VI, § 601(a)
May 2 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(b), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-307.
1973 Ed., § 33-307.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 48-601 to 48-610, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.